Hawaii statutes.
§462A-17 Description of pilotage waters.
Pilotage waters as established under this chapter shall be the waters of the
State described as follows:

(1) Port Allen: All waters inside a line drawn from
Puolu Point to Weli Point.

(2) Nawiliwili: All waters inside a line drawn from
Ninini Point to Kawaii Point.

(3) Honolulu: All waters inside a line drawn from
Diamond Head Light, 278° true, to the intersection of a line drawn from the
seaward edge of the reef runway at Latitude 21°-18.2' North and Longitude 157°-55.6'
West, 180° true.

(4) Kahului: All waters inside a line drawn from
Waiehu Point to Waihee Reef Lighted Buoy 2 in Latitude 20° 55.9' North and
Longitude 156° 28.5' West and thence to Papaula Point.

(5) Hilo: All waters inside a line drawn from the
outer extremity of the Hilo Bay breakwater to Paukaa Point Light.

(6) Kawaihae: All waters inside a line drawn from
the outer extremity of the Kawaihae Harbor breakwater due West to Longitude 155°
51' West, thence due North to Latitude 20°03' North and thence due East to
where it intersects with the shoreline.

(7) Barbers Point: All waters inside a line drawn
from the northernmost refinery tower, 250° true, to the intersection of a line
drawn tangentially to Maile Point, 165° true. [L 1978, c 231, pt of §2; am L
1986, c 104, §1; am L 1992, c 25, §2]

[L 1978, c 231, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 104, §1; am L 1992,
c 25, §2]

Revision Note

In paragraph (6), "20°03'" substituted for "20°03°".

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next